src/fst/orthography/spellrelax-weighted.regex
# Copyright © 2015–2019 Alberta Language Technology Lab (ALTLab)
# http://altlab.artsrn.ualberta.ca/
#
# This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
# this file under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.
#
# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program. If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Plains Cree long vowel variation.

i (->) %'::0.0, # short-i elision
â (->) {ā}, # a + combining macron U+0304
ê (->) {ē}, # e + combining macron U+0304
î (->) {ī}, # i + combining macron U+0304
ô (->) {ō}, # o + combining macron U+0304

â (->) ā, # a macron
ê (->) ē, # e macron
î (->) ī, # i macron
ô (->) ō, # o macron

â (->) {â}, # a + combining circumflex accent U+0302
ê (->) {ê}, # e + combining circumflex accent U+0302
î (->) {î}, # i + combining circumflex accent U+0302
ô (->) {ô}, # o + combining circumflex accent U+0302

# Long vowel markings are frequently dropped:

â (->) a::0.25,
ê (->) e::0.0,
î (->) i::0.25,
ô (->) o::0.25,

# NS 152 materials consistantly write some vowels as long where Arok's write
# them as short.
# E.G. NS 152 give 'askîy' and Arok gives 'askiy.'
a (->) â::0.5,
i (->) î::0.5,
o (->) ô::0.5,,

# Prefix-final vowel (preceded by consonant) dropped before initial vowel for following morpheme
[ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ]  (->) 0::1.0 || [ c | k | m | n | p | s | t | w | y ] _ (%-) [ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ] ,,

# Dealing with spaces instead of hyphens as separators in multipart words

[ %- ] (->) 0::1.0, # Missing hyphens between prefixes/preverbs
[ %- ] (->) [ %- ]+,  # Multiple hyphens into a single hyphen
%- (->) [ %  | %  | %  ]+, # Multiple non-breaking or standard spaces SPACE + NBSP + NNBSP (in syllabics) to single hyphen

# Dealing with English-influenced divergences from SRO, and misspellings based on modern pronunciation

# Vowels
[ i | î ] (->) {ee}::0.0,
[ a | â ] (->) u::0.0,
ê (->) [ {ay} | {eh} ]::1.0,

# Consonants
k (->) g::0.0,   # intervocalic voiced pronunciation to stops, maybe context should be added (including <c> overgenerates)
p (->) b::0.0,   # intervocalic voiced pronunciation to stops, maybe context should be added
t (->) d::0.0,   # intervocalic voiced pronunciation to stops, maybe context should be added
c (->) j::0.0,   # English influence on spelling <c>

# Glides
# e.g., "tanisi ê-isiyihkâsoyan -> "tan'si ê-sikâsowan"
# TODO: figure out what conditions this (probably /o/ or /i/)
# These rules without context are EXCESSIVELY productive!
# y (->) w,
# w (->) y,

# Proto-Algonquian dialectal /y/
y (->) ý::0.0,

{iw} (->) {ow}::0.5,     # Misspelling based on assimilated pronunciation of underlying /i/ as /o/ before /w/
{ow} (->) {iw}::0.5,
{iyi} (->) [ î | i ]::0.5,    # Mishearing of vowel-glide-vowel cluster
{nwa} (->) {no}::0.5,         # <nwa> is likely to be heard as <no>

c (->) {ch}::0.0,        # English influence on spelling <c>
c (->) {tch}::0.0,       # English influence on spelling <c>
c (->) {ts}::0.0 ,,      # Another English influence on spelling <c>

[..] (->) h::0.25 || [ a | i | o | â | ê | î | ô ] _ [ c | k | p | t ] ,, # Excessive preaspiration before stops
[..] (->) h::0.25 || _ .#. ,,                                             # Excessive word-final pre-aspiration
   h (->) 0::0.5 || [ a | i | o | â | ê | î | ô ] _ [ c | k | p | t ] ,,  # Missing preaspiration before stops

# Woods Cree to Plains Cree
[ ý | y ] (->) {th}::0.5 ,,
ê (->) [ î | i ]::5.0 ,, # This has to be relatively costly to produce decent Plains Cree suggestions

# Adding missing or reduced short i's in interconsonantal contexts
i (->) [..] || [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t | w | y | b | g | d ] _ [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t | w | y | b | g | d ]::1.0

;

#
# Explanation:
# lexical side (->) input
# Or, in other words:
# correct (->) in use out there
